csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Imp_i.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikan
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikeg
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: miijiikang
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijiken
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: miijikegon
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: miijisiidaa
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: miijisiidaanin
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: miijin
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [miijig,miijik]
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: miijidaa
     miijin+VTI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: miijidaanin
